Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1 General Provisions

3-6-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Dessert wine” means a wine having an alcoholic strength of more than 14 percent alcohol by volume but not more than 24 percent alcohol by volume.

“Domestic winery” means any winery, manufacturer, maker, producer, or bottler of wine located within the state.

“Foreign winery” means any winery, manufacturer, maker, producer, or bottler of wine located outside the state.

“Table wine” means a wine having an alcoholic strength of not more than 14 percent alcohol by volume.

“Winery” means a manufacturer of wine.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-5101, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 366, § 2/SB 286.

3-6-2.
Determination as to when possession occurs.

For purposes of this chapter, with respect to wines manufactured within this state, possession occurs when the product is first identifiable as wine, in accordance with this title and such regulations as may be promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this title. With respect to wines shipped from outside this state to a destination within this state, possession in the consignee occurs when the wine first physically enters the state or when the risk of loss from destruction or casualty to the wine is shifted from the consignor to the consignee located in this state, in accordance with the contract of the parties and the substantive commercial law of this state, whichever event occurs first.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-803, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5102, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

Cross references.

Placement of risk of loss in absence of breach of contract, §

11-2-509

.

3-6-3.
Household production.

A head of a household may produce 200 gallons of wine in any one calendar year to be consumed within his own household without any requirement to be licensed for such purpose. Wine so produced shall not be subject to any excise tax imposed by this chapter.

For purposes of this Code section, a single individual who is not a dependent of another person for purposes of Georgia income taxation shall be considered a head of a household.

History.

Code 1933, § 58-826, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-5103, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-6-4.
Removal of partially consumed bottle of wine from premises.

Notwithstanding any other contrary provision of law, any restaurant which is licensed to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises may permit a patron to remove one unsealed bottle of wine per patron for consumption off premises, if the patron has purchased a meal and consumed a portion of the bottle of wine which has been purchased on the premises with such meal on the restaurant’s premises. A partially consumed bottle of wine that is to be removed from the premises must be securely resealed by the licensee or its employees before removal from the premises. The partially consumed bottle of wine shall be placed in a bag or other container that is secured in such a manner that it is visibly apparent if the container has been subsequently opened or tampered with, and a dated receipt for the bottle of wine and meal shall be provided by the licensee and attached to the container. If transported in a motor vehicle, the container with the resealed bottle of wine shall be placed in a locked glove compartment, a locked trunk, or the area behind the last upright seat of a motor vehicle that is not equipped with a trunk.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-6-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 834, § 1/SB 55.

Cross references.

Consumption of alcoholic beverage or possession of open container of alcoholic beverage in passenger area of motor vehicle, §

40-6-253

.